Kentucky statutes. TITLE XX Alcoholic Beverages
Penalties

244.990.
Penalties.

Any person who, alone or acting through another, directly or indirectly, violates any of the provisions of this chapter for which no other penalty is provided shall, for the first offense, be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor; and for the second and each subsequent violation, the person shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor. The penalties provided for in this subsection shall be in addition to the revocation of the offender’s license. If the offender is a corporation, joint stock company, association, fiduciary, limited liability company, or other business entity recognized by law, the principal officer or officers responsible for the violation may be imprisoned.

Any person who violates KRS

244.170

shall, upon the first conviction, be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor. Upon a second conviction the person shall be guilty of a Class D felony. Upon the third and each subsequent conviction, the person shall be guilty of a Class C felony.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of KRS

244.480

to

244.600

shall be guilty of a violation.

Except as provided in subsection (7) of this section, any person, firm, corporation, limited liability company, or other business entity recognized by law violating any provision of KRS

244.083

and

244.085

shall be guilty of a violation and each violation shall constitute a separate offense.

Except as provided in subsection (7) of this section, any person who violates the provisions of KRS

244.085

shall, for the first offense, be guilty of a violation, and for each subsequent offense shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

Any person who violates KRS

244.125

shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor for the first offense and a Class D felony for each subsequent offense.

For any person under the age of eighteen (18) years, a violation of KRS 244.085(1), (2), (3), (4), or (7) shall be deemed a status offense and shall be under the jurisdiction of the juvenile session of the District Court or the family division of the Circuit Court, as appropriate.

HISTORY:

2554b-67, 2554b-152, 2554b-196, 2554b-219: amend. Acts 1968, ch. 62, § 6; 1972, ch. 286, § 3; 1980, ch. 254, § 10; 1982, ch. 312, § 10, effective July 1, 1986; 1986, ch. 336, § 10, effective July 15, 1986; 1992, ch. 463, § 32, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 396, § 7, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 121, § 35, effective July 15, 1998; 2008, ch. 87, § 23, effective July 15, 2008; 2017 ch. 62, § 113, effective June 29, 2017.

244.992.
Medical amnesty for persons reporting an alcohol overdose.

A person shall be immune from prosecution for the criminal offenses identified in subsection (2) of this section if:

A law enforcement officer has contact with the person because the person:

Requests emergency medical assistance for himself or herself or another person;

Acts in concert with another person who requests emergency medical assistance; or

Appears to be in need of emergency medical assistance and is the individual for whom the request is made;

The request is made for an individual who reasonably appears to be in need of medical assistance due to alcohol consumption; and

The person described in paragraph (a) of this subsection, if physically capable:

Provides his or her own full name if requested by emergency medical assistance personnel or law enforcement officers;

Provides any other relevant information requested by the law enforcement officer that is known to such person;

Remains with, or is, the individual who reasonably appears to be in need of medical assistance due to alcohol consumption until professional emergency medical assistance is provided; and

Cooperates with emergency medical assistance personnel and law enforcement officers.

A person who meets the qualifications set forth in subsection (1) of this section shall be immune from criminal prosecution for the following offenses:

Alcohol intoxication under KRS 222.202(1);

Drinking alcoholic beverages in a public place under KRS 222.202(2);

Offenses related to possession of alcoholic beverages by a minor under twenty-one (21) years of age under KRS

244.085

; and

Providing alcohol to minors under twenty-one (21) years of age or assisting minors under twenty-one (21) years of age to purchase alcohol under KRS

244.085

or

530.070

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 121, § 81, effective June 25, 2013.